North Carolina, session 2025, HB152.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-254. Coverage of transcranial magnetic stimulation.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(2) Insurer. – As defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
(3) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(4) Transcranial magnetic stimulation. – A noninvasive healthcare treatment that
uses pulsed magnetic fields to induce an electric current in a localized region
of a patient's brain.
(b) Insurers offering a health benefit plan in this State that provides coverage for
transcranial magnetic stimulation shall provide coverage for all transcranial magnetic stimulation
procedures performed by a healthcare facility or properly licensed healthcare provider for whom
ordering, performing, and supervising the treatment of depression and other mental disorders is
within their scope of practice in accordance with Chapter 90 of the General Statutes and may not
penalize any properly licensed healthcare provider or healthcare facility that properly submits a
claim for services related to transcranial magnetic stimulation based on the medical specialty of
the healthcare provider or healthcare facility submitting the claim.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, it shall be within the discretion of each
insurer offering a health benefit plan in the State that provides coverage for transcranial magnetic
stimulation to determine all of the following aspects of the coverage:
(1) Whether to cover transcranial magnetic stimulation procedures.
(2) Indications for which transcranial magnetic stimulation procedures shall be
covered.
(3) Requirements for coverage for transcranial magnetic stimulation procedures.
(4) Reimbursement rates for transcranial magnetic stimulation procedures.
(d) Penalties prohibited under this section include the denial of, or the reduction of, or
the placement of limitations on the reimbursement of a properly submitted claim, or any other
negative treatment of a properly submitted claim.
*H152-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Reimbursement rates that differ based upon any of the following are allowable and
shall not be considered a penalty prohibited under this section:
(1) A healthcare provider's participation or lack of participation in the network of
an insurer.
(2) The location where the transcranial magnetic stimulation services are
provided.
(3) The level of training, certification, or education of the healthcare provider,
within that provider's medical specialty, that has provided the transcranial
magnetic stimulation services."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 135-48.51 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(8a) G.S. 58-3-254, Coverage of transcranial magnetic stimulation. It is within the
discretion of the Plan to determine all aspects of the coverage of transcranial
magnetic stimulation identified under G.S. 58-3-254(b)."
SECTION 2. This act is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to insurance contracts
issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 152-First Edition